Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.290

Notice—Penalty for contractor failing to respond.

It is a gross misdemeanor for a contractor who has been personally served with a notice of infraction to willfully fail to respond to a notice of infraction as provided in this chapter, regardless of the ultimate disposition of the infraction.

[ 2007 c 436 s 16; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.